language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 446 Y 10
SFX 446 0 ch .
SFX 446 0 chmej .
SFX 446 0 chmy .
SFX 446 0 chu .
SFX 446 0 m .
SFX 446 0 mej .
SFX 446 0 my .
SFX 446 0 š .
SFX 446 0 štej .
SFX 446 0 šćo .
SFX 447 Y 17
SFX 447 0 a .
SFX 447 0 ach .
SFX 447 0 am .
SFX 447 0 ami .
SFX 447 0 i .
SFX 447 0 imi .
SFX 447 0 mej .
SFX 447 0 my .
SFX 447 0 oju .
SFX 447 0 om .
SFX 447 0 oma .
SFX 447 0 ow .
SFX 447 0 owu .
SFX 447 0 tej .
SFX 447 0 u .
SFX 447 0 y .
SFX 447 0 śo .
SFX 448 Y 14
SFX 448 0 im .
SFX 448 0 imgakuli .
SFX 448 0 imž .
SFX 448 0 imžkuli .
SFX 448 0 og .
SFX 448 0 ogo .
SFX 448 0 ogogakuli .
SFX 448 0 ogož .
SFX 448 0 ogožkuli .
SFX 448 0 om .
SFX 448 0 omu .
SFX 448 0 omugakuli .
SFX 448 0 omuž .
SFX 448 0 omužkuli .
SFX 449 Y 8
SFX 449 0 im .
SFX 449 0 imžkuli .
SFX 449 0 og .
SFX 449 0 ogo .
SFX 449 0 ogožkuli .
SFX 449 0 om .
SFX 449 0 omu .
SFX 449 0 omužkuli .
SFX 450 Y 14
SFX 450 0 a .
SFX 450 0 e .
SFX 450 0 ej .
SFX 450 0 eje .
SFX 450 0 eju .
SFX 450 0 ich .
SFX 450 0 im .
SFX 450 0 ima .
SFX 450 0 imi .
SFX 450 0 u .
SFX 450 0 ych .
SFX 450 0 ym .
SFX 450 0 yma .
SFX 450 0 ymi .
SFX 451 Y 22
SFX 451 0 a .
SFX 451 0 ach .
SFX 451 0 am .
SFX 451 0 ami .
SFX 451 0 e .
SFX 451 0 mej .
SFX 451 0 my .
SFX 451 0 oma .
SFX 451 0 ow .
SFX 451 0 owu .
SFX 451 0 tej .
SFX 451 0 u .
SFX 451 0 y .
SFX 451 0 yjo .
SFX 451 0 yjom .
SFX 451 0 yjomej .
SFX 451 0 yjomy .
SFX 451 0 yjotej .
SFX 451 0 yjośo .
SFX 451 0 yjoš .
SFX 451 0 yju .
SFX 451 0 ćo .
SFX 452 Y 20
SFX 452 0 ach .
SFX 452 0 am .
SFX 452 0 ami .
SFX 452 0 mej .
SFX 452 0 my .
SFX 452 0 oma .
SFX 452 0 ow .
SFX 452 0 owu .
SFX 452 0 tej .
SFX 452 0 u .
SFX 452 0 y .
SFX 452 0 yjo .
SFX 452 0 yjom .
SFX 452 0 yjomej .
SFX 452 0 yjomy .
SFX 452 0 yjotej .
SFX 452 0 yjośo .
SFX 452 0 yjoš .
SFX 452 0 yju .
SFX 452 0 ćo .
SFX 453 Y 34
SFX 453 0 a .
SFX 453 0 ach .
SFX 453 0 am .
SFX 453 0 ami .
SFX 453 0 e .
SFX 453 0 eg .
SFX 453 0 ego .
SFX 453 0 ej .
SFX 453 0 eje .
SFX 453 0 eju .
SFX 453 0 em .
SFX 453 0 emu .
SFX 453 0 i .
SFX 453 0 im .
SFX 453 0 imej .
SFX 453 0 imy .
SFX 453 0 itej .
SFX 453 0 iśo .
SFX 453 0 iš .
SFX 453 0 mej .
SFX 453 0 my .
SFX 453 0 oju .
SFX 453 0 om .
SFX 453 0 oma .
SFX 453 0 ow .
SFX 453 0 owu .
SFX 453 0 tej .
SFX 453 0 u .
SFX 453 0 y .
SFX 453 0 ych .
SFX 453 0 ym .
SFX 453 0 yma .
SFX 453 0 ymi .
SFX 453 0 śo .
SFX 454 Y 14
SFX 454 0 ech .
SFX 454 0 echmej .
SFX 454 0 echmy .
SFX 454 0 echu .
SFX 454 0 ešo .
SFX 454 0 eštej .
SFX 454 0 ešćo .
SFX 454 0 o .
SFX 454 0 om .
SFX 454 0 omej .
SFX 454 0 omy .
SFX 454 0 otej .
SFX 454 0 ośo .
SFX 454 0 oš .
SFX 455 Y 14
SFX 455 0 ech .
SFX 455 0 echmej .
SFX 455 0 echmy .
SFX 455 0 echu .
SFX 455 0 ešo .
SFX 455 0 eštej .
SFX 455 0 ešćo .
SFX 455 0 o .
SFX 455 0 om .
SFX 455 0 omej .
SFX 455 0 omy .
SFX 455 0 otej .
SFX 455 0 ośo .
SFX 455 0 oš .
SFX 456 Y 15
SFX 456 0 e .
SFX 456 0 ech .
SFX 456 0 echmej .
SFX 456 0 echmy .
SFX 456 0 echu .
SFX 456 0 ešo .
SFX 456 0 eštej .
SFX 456 0 ešćo .
SFX 456 0 o .
SFX 456 0 om .
SFX 456 0 omej .
SFX 456 0 omy .
SFX 456 0 otej .
SFX 456 0 ośo .
SFX 456 0 oš .
SFX 457 Y 15
SFX 457 0 e .
SFX 457 0 ech .
SFX 457 0 echmej .
SFX 457 0 echmy .
SFX 457 0 echu .
SFX 457 0 ešo .
SFX 457 0 eštej .
SFX 457 0 ešćo .
SFX 457 0 o .
SFX 457 0 om .
SFX 457 0 omej .
SFX 457 0 omy .
SFX 457 0 otej .
SFX 457 0 ośo .
SFX 457 0 oš .
SFX 458 Y 16
SFX 458 0 a .
SFX 458 0 ach .
SFX 458 0 am .
SFX 458 0 ami .
SFX 458 0 i .
SFX 458 0 imej .
SFX 458 0 imy .
SFX 458 0 itej .
SFX 458 0 iśo .
SFX 458 0 o .
SFX 458 0 oju .
SFX 458 0 om .
SFX 458 0 oma .
SFX 458 0 ow .
SFX 458 0 owu .
SFX 458 0 u .
SFX 459 Y 16
SFX 459 0 a .
SFX 459 0 ach .
SFX 459 0 am .
SFX 459 0 ami .
SFX 459 0 i .
SFX 459 0 imej .
SFX 459 0 imy .
SFX 459 0 itej .
SFX 459 0 iśo .
SFX 459 0 oju .
SFX 459 0 om .
SFX 459 0 oma .
SFX 459 0 ow .
SFX 459 0 owu .
SFX 459 0 u .
SFX 459 0 y .
SFX 460 Y 17
SFX 460 0 a .
SFX 460 0 ach .
SFX 460 0 am .
SFX 460 0 ami .
SFX 460 0 e .
SFX 460 0 ej .
SFX 460 0 eje .
SFX 460 0 eju .
SFX 460 0 i .
SFX 460 0 ich .
SFX 460 0 im .
SFX 460 0 ima .
SFX 460 0 imi .
SFX 460 0 oma .
SFX 460 0 ow .
SFX 460 0 owu .
SFX 460 0 u .
SFX 461 Y 24
SFX 461 0 a .
SFX 461 0 ach .
SFX 461 0 achmej .
SFX 461 0 achmy .
SFX 461 0 achu .
SFX 461 0 am .
SFX 461 0 ami .
SFX 461 0 ašo .
SFX 461 0 aštej .
SFX 461 0 ašćo .
SFX 461 0 e .
SFX 461 0 eju .
SFX 461 0 o .
SFX 461 0 oju .
SFX 461 0 om .
SFX 461 0 oma .
SFX 461 0 omej .
SFX 461 0 omy .
SFX 461 0 otej .
SFX 461 0 ow .
SFX 461 0 owu .
SFX 461 0 ośo .
SFX 461 0 oš .
SFX 461 0 u .
SFX 462 Y 18
SFX 462 0 a .
SFX 462 0 ach .
SFX 462 0 am .
SFX 462 0 ami .
SFX 462 0 i .
SFX 462 0 im .
SFX 462 0 imej .
SFX 462 0 imy .
SFX 462 0 itej .
SFX 462 0 iśo .
SFX 462 0 iš .
SFX 462 0 oju .
SFX 462 0 om .
SFX 462 0 oma .
SFX 462 0 ow .
SFX 462 0 owu .
SFX 462 0 u .
SFX 462 0 y .
SFX 463 Y 18
SFX 463 0 a .
SFX 463 0 ach .
SFX 463 0 am .
SFX 463 0 ami .
SFX 463 0 i .
SFX 463 0 im .
SFX 463 0 imej .
SFX 463 0 imy .
SFX 463 0 itej .
SFX 463 0 iśo .
SFX 463 0 iš .
SFX 463 0 oju .
SFX 463 0 om .
SFX 463 0 oma .
SFX 463 0 ow .
SFX 463 0 owu .
SFX 463 0 u .
SFX 463 0 y .
SFX 464 Y 18
SFX 464 0 a .
SFX 464 0 ach .
SFX 464 0 am .
SFX 464 0 ami .
SFX 464 0 i .
SFX 464 0 im .
SFX 464 0 imej .
SFX 464 0 imy .
SFX 464 0 itej .
SFX 464 0 iśo .
SFX 464 0 iš .
SFX 464 0 o .
SFX 464 0 oju .
SFX 464 0 om .
SFX 464 0 oma .
SFX 464 0 ow .
SFX 464 0 owu .
SFX 464 0 u .
SFX 465 Y 19
SFX 465 0 a .
SFX 465 0 ach .
SFX 465 0 am .
SFX 465 0 ami .
SFX 465 0 i .
SFX 465 0 im .
SFX 465 0 imej .
SFX 465 0 imy .
SFX 465 0 itej .
SFX 465 0 iśo .
SFX 465 0 iš .
SFX 465 0 o .
SFX 465 0 oju .
SFX 465 0 om .
SFX 465 0 oma .
SFX 465 0 ow .
SFX 465 0 owu .
SFX 465 0 u .
SFX 465 0 y .
SFX 466 Y 19
SFX 466 0 a .
SFX 466 0 ach .
SFX 466 0 am .
SFX 466 0 ami .
SFX 466 0 i .
SFX 466 0 im .
SFX 466 0 imej .
SFX 466 0 imy .
SFX 466 0 itej .
SFX 466 0 iśo .
SFX 466 0 iš .
SFX 466 0 o .
SFX 466 0 oju .
SFX 466 0 om .
SFX 466 0 oma .
SFX 466 0 ow .
SFX 466 0 owu .
SFX 466 0 u .
SFX 466 0 y .
SFX 467 Y 18
SFX 467 0 a .
SFX 467 0 ach .
SFX 467 0 am .
SFX 467 0 ami .
SFX 467 0 e .
SFX 467 0 eg .
SFX 467 0 ego .
SFX 467 0 ej .
SFX 467 0 eje .
SFX 467 0 eju .
SFX 467 0 em .
SFX 467 0 emu .
SFX 467 0 oju .
SFX 467 0 om .
SFX 467 0 oma .
SFX 467 0 ow .
SFX 467 0 owu .
SFX 467 0 u .
SFX 468 Y 35
SFX 468 0 a .
SFX 468 0 ach .
SFX 468 0 am .
SFX 468 0 ami .
SFX 468 0 e .
SFX 468 0 eg .
SFX 468 0 ego .
SFX 468 0 ej .
SFX 468 0 eje .
SFX 468 0 eju .
SFX 468 0 em .
SFX 468 0 emu .
SFX 468 0 ijo .
SFX 468 0 ijom .
SFX 468 0 ijomej .
SFX 468 0 ijomy .
SFX 468 0 ijotej .
SFX 468 0 ijośo .
SFX 468 0 ijoš .
SFX 468 0 iju .
SFX 468 0 mej .
SFX 468 0 my .
SFX 468 0 oju .
SFX 468 0 om .
SFX 468 0 oma .
SFX 468 0 ow .
SFX 468 0 owu .
SFX 468 0 tej .
SFX 468 0 u .
SFX 468 0 y .
SFX 468 0 ych .
SFX 468 0 ym .
SFX 468 0 yma .
SFX 468 0 ymi .
SFX 468 0 śo .
SFX 469 Y 17
SFX 469 0 a .
SFX 469 0 e .
SFX 469 0 eg .
SFX 469 0 ego .
SFX 469 0 ej .
SFX 469 0 eje .
SFX 469 0 eju .
SFX 469 0 em .
SFX 469 0 emu .
SFX 469 0 i .
SFX 469 0 ich .
SFX 469 0 im .
SFX 469 0 ima .
SFX 469 0 imi .
SFX 469 0 oma .
SFX 469 0 owu .
SFX 469 0 u .
SFX 470 Y 17
SFX 470 0 a .
SFX 470 0 ach .
SFX 470 0 am .
SFX 470 0 ami .
SFX 470 0 i .
SFX 470 0 im .
SFX 470 0 imej .
SFX 470 0 imy .
SFX 470 0 itej .
SFX 470 0 iśo .
SFX 470 0 iš .
SFX 470 0 oma .
SFX 470 0 ow .
SFX 470 0 owu .
SFX 470 0 u .
SFX 470 0 y .
SFX 470 0 ymi .
SFX 471 Y 33
SFX 471 0 ach .
SFX 471 0 achmej .
SFX 471 0 achmy .
SFX 471 0 achu .
SFX 471 0 ašo .
SFX 471 0 aštej .
SFX 471 0 ašćo .
SFX 471 0 e .
SFX 471 0 ech .
SFX 471 0 echmej .
SFX 471 0 echmy .
SFX 471 0 echu .
SFX 471 0 eštej .
SFX 471 0 ešćo .
SFX 471 0 mej .
SFX 471 0 my .
SFX 471 0 o .
SFX 471 0 om .
SFX 471 0 omej .
SFX 471 0 omy .
SFX 471 0 otej .
SFX 471 0 ośo .
SFX 471 0 oš .
SFX 471 0 tej .
SFX 471 0 yjo .
SFX 471 0 yjom .
SFX 471 0 yjomej .
SFX 471 0 yjomy .
SFX 471 0 yjotej .
SFX 471 0 yjośo .
SFX 471 0 yjoš .
SFX 471 0 yju .
SFX 471 0 ćo .
