language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.dic
Brěšć/1,460
Dobr/1,450
Sněgoběłučk/1,460
Zulužeńsk/1,460
bagn/464
baran/462
bjerj/1,454
blandr/1,465
blar/466
blědnj/1,454
cen/462
chamnj/1,454
chrom/453
chudnj/1,454
cukor/462
cwjern/462
cyn/462
derbnj/1,454
dojě/446
dozjě/446
eksžeńsk/1,460
gasnj/1,454
gin/459
ginj/1,456
gnj/1,454
gown/464
grab/447
góleś/1,469
gón/462
górjejśěgnj/1,454
górknj/1,454
głodnj/1,454
głuchnj/1,454
hindužeńsk/1,460
k/448
kacor/462
kameražeńsk/1,460
kisnj/1,454
klin/462
kludnj/1,454
kopj/1,461
krydnj/1,454
kumpan/462
kur/1,470
kurjeś/1,469
kócor/462
kólen/464
kórknj/1,454
kšadnj/1,454
lagnj/1,454
len/458
lin/462
man/462
marznj/1,454
mechnj/1,454
minj/1,456
mjelknj/1,454
moknj/1,454
měknj/1,454
měr/462
měłknj/1,454
najě/446
naric/452
njebjerj/1,454
njeblědnj/1,454
njechamnj/1,454
njechudnj/1,454
njederbnj/1,454
njedojě/446
njedozjě/446
njegasnj/1,454
njeginj/1,454
njegnj/1,454
njegórjejśěgnj/1,454
njegórknj/1,454
njegłodnj/1,454
njegłuchnj/1,454
njekisnj/1,454
njekludnj/1,454
njekrydnj/1,454
njekórknj/1,454
njekšadnj/1,454
njelagnj/1,454
njemarznj/1,454
njemechnj/1,454
njeminj/1,454
njemjelknj/1,454
njemoknj/1,454
njeměknj/1,454
njeměr/462
njeměłknj/1,454
njenajě/446
njepjerj/1,454
njepustnj/1,454
njepódnuŕknj/1,454
njepójě/446
njepólenj/1,454
njepśejě/446
njepśewuknj/1,454
njepśežerj/1,454
njepśijě/446
njepśiwuknj/1,454
njepśiśěgnj/1,454
njepšostnj/1,454
njerosć/455
njerozjě/446
njeschnj/1,454
njeserj/1,454
njeskludnj/1,454
njesliznj/1,454
njesmagnj/1,454
njesobuwuknj/1,454
njestarnj/1,454
njestudnj/1,454
njesypnj/1,454
njesćaknj/1,454
njesłabnj/1,454
njewjedr/464
njewobjě/446
njewobocnj/1,454
njewujě/446
njewuknj/1,454
njewójě/446
njewótjě/446
njezajě/446
njezamóž/471
njezjě/446
njeśichnj/1,454
njeśěgnj/1,454
njeźerj/1,454
nježerj/1,454
nježołtnj/1,454
něk/1,449
plundr/1,463
poweržeńsk/1,460
pustnj/1,454
pódnuŕknj/1,454
pójě/446
pólenj/1,454
póstrow/468
pśejě/446
pśewuknj/1,454
pśežerj/1,454
pśijě/446
pśiwuknj/1,454
pśiśěgnj/1,454
pšostnj/1,454
rosć/457
rozjě/446
schnj/1,454
serj/1,456
skaz/452
skludnj/1,454
sliznj/1,454
slěp/453
smagnj/1,454
směr/462
sobuwuknj/1,454
stan/459
starnj/1,454
surow/453
swědr/464
sypnj/1,454
sćaknj/1,454
słabnj/1,454
ton/462
tunj/1,467
turan/462
wichor/462
wjedr/464
wobjě/446
wobocnj/1,454
wobśěž/451
wujě/446
wuknj/1,454
wójě/446
wótjě/446
zajě/446
zamóž/471
zjě/446
zwaž/452
zwón/462
śichnj/1,454
śěgnj/1,454
štyr/462
źerj/1,454
źiw/453
žerj/1,454
žołtnj/1,454
